Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-538
Directors; compensation; expenses.

Each director shall receive from the board a per diem of not to exceed seventy dollars per day for each day that such director attends a board meeting or is engaged in matters concerning the district, but no director shall receive more than two thousand eight hundred dollars in any one year. Each director shall also be entitled to any necessary traveling expenses actually expended while engaged in the performance of his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 10(3), p. 534;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 76;

Laws 2001, LB 409, § 1.

Additional expenses, board may reimburse, Local Government Miscellaneous Expenditure Act, see section 13-2201.